Missouri, session 2026, SB1324.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 407, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
seven new sections, to be known as sections 407.3000, 407.3001,
407.3002, 407.3003, 407.3004, 407.3005, and 407.3006, to read
as follows:
407.3000. The provisions of sections 407.3000 to
407.3006 shall be known as and may be cited as the "Missouri
Artificial Intelligence Transparency and Accountability Act"
and shall become effective on January 1, 2027.
407.3001. As used in sections 407.3002 to 407.3006,
the following terms shall mean:
(1) "AI-generated content", any text, audio, image,
video, or other media created or substantially modified by
an AI system;
(2) "Artificial intelligence system" or "AI system", a
computer-based system that can, for a given set of human-
defined objectives, make predictions, recommendations, or
decisions influencing real or virtual environments,
including generative artificial intelligence capable of
producing text, audio, images, or video;

SB 1324 2
(3) "Deepfake", AI-generated or manipulated media that
depicts a person saying or doing something they did not say
or do, often with deceptive intent;
(4) "Deployer", an entity that uses an AI system to
generate content for public consumption;
(5) "Developer", an entity that designs, builds, or
trains an AI system;
(6) "Public consumption", content distributed through
platforms accessible to the general public, including social
media, websites, broadcasts, or other public forums, whether
free or paid;
(7) "Usage log", a record of AI system operations,
including the date, time, user identity (if applicable),
input parameters, and output generated;
(8) "Watermark", a visible or embedded marker
indicating that content is AI-generated.
407.3002. 1. Any person or entity creating AI-
generated content for public consumption shall clearly label
the content as "AI-generated" in a prominent and conspicuous
manner. The label shall include the following:
(1) The name of the AI system used and, if applicable,
the name of the developer or deployer;
(2) If text is used, the label shall appear at the
beginning of the text or in a visible header or footer;
(3) If audio is used, a verbal or audible disclosure
at the start of the audio. For any audio exceeding thirty
seconds, the disclosure shall appear every two minutes; and
(4) For images or videos, a visible watermark or
overlay embedded with a text disclosure appearing in
metadata and captions.
2. Any AI-generated content depicting a real
individual including, but not limited to, audio or video

SB 1324 3
mimicking voices or likeness, shall include an additional
disclaimer as follows: "This content is AI-generated and
does not reflect the actual statements or actions of the
depicted individual". Deployers shall verify the
authenticity of the content under this subsection before
generating such content and shall obtain consent from the
individual depicted in the content, except if the content is
used for parody or satire.
3. Labels and watermarks on any AI-generated content
required under section 407.3002 shall be accessible to
individuals with disabilities pursuant to section 508 of the
federal Rehabilitation Act, Web Content Accessibility
Guidelines (WCAG) 2.1, or any other provisions of current
law. Exceptions include:
(1) Content generated for private and non-commercial
use that is not shared publicly;
(2) AI-generated content used solely for internal
business operations for research, not intended for public
distribution; or
(3) Content that uses minimal AI assistance that does
not substantially alter the content's meaning or authorship,
including, but not limited to, grammar correction tools.
407.3003. 1. Developers and deployers shall maintain
usage logs for all AI system content distributed for public
consumption. Such usage logs shall include:
(1) Date and time of content generation;
(2) Identity of the user or entity generating the
content, if applicable;
(3) Input parameters or prompts used;
(4) Description of the output, including, but not
limited to, the type of content, file size, intended
platform; and

SB 1324 4
(5) Metadata linking the log to the specific AI system
and version.
2. Usage logs under this subsection shall be retained
for a minimum of seven years from the date of content
generation, unless otherwise required by current law.
3. Usage logs under this subsection shall be stored
with encryption and any access to the logs shall be
controlled by the developer or deployer to prevent
unauthorized access.
4. Any personal data in the usage logs shall be kept
anonymous and protected pursuant to current law, except when
requested for law enforcement purposes. Such data shall
only be available to law enforcement upon the issuance of a
warrant or a subpoena specifying the scope of the request.
Developers and deployers shall provide the logs within
fourteen business days after receiving the warrant or
subpoena, unless expedited by a court order. Law
enforcement may use the logs to investigate violations of
sections 407.3000 to 407.3006, fraud, identity theft,
election interference, or any other violation involving AI-
generated content.
407.3004. 1. The attorney general shall enforce
provisions of sections 407.3000 to 407.3006. Any person may
report violations of sections 407.3000 to 407.3006 to the
attorney general. If the attorney general finds that
provisions of sections 407.3000 to 407.3006 have been
violated, the attorney general shall commence a civil action
in the court of competent jurisdiction. If the court finds
that a violation occurred, the court may grant actual
damages, injunctive relief, attorney fees, and any such
other relief the court finds appropriate. The court may
grant civil penalties as follows:

SB 1324 5
(1) A civil penalty not to exceed five thousand
dollars for the first violation;
(2) A civil penalty not to exceed twenty-five thousand
dollars for any subsequent violation;
(3) A civil penalty not to exceed fifty thousand
dollars per violation for failure to maintain usage logs; and
(4) A civil penalty not to exceed one hundred thousand
dollars per violation for any violation involving knowingly
producing deepfakes without labeling and consent pursuant to
section 407.3002.
2. Nothing in this section shall preclude an
individual from bringing a private civil action in a court
of competent jurisdiction for any violation of sections
407.3000 to 407.3006.
3. Individuals and entities that demonstrate good-
faith compliance with sections 407.3000 to 407.3006,
including, but not limited to, implementing industry-
standard watermarking or maintaining usage logs, may raise
an affirmative defense to reduce civil penalties, provided
they cure any violation within thirty days after receiving
notice of the civil action under this section.
407.3005. 1. Within one hundred and eighty days after
the effective date of sections 407.3000 to 407.3006, the
Missouri department of commerce and insurance may promulgate
rules to enforce provisions of sections 407.3000 to
407.3006. The rules shall specify technical standards for
watermarks and labels, define acceptable formats for usage
logs, and establish procedures for law enforcement access to
the usage logs. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term
is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
authority delegated in this section shall become effective
only if it complies with and is subject to all of the

SB 1324 6
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
2026, shall be invalid and void.
2. The department shall launch a public awareness
campaign to educate Missouri residents about AI-generated
content and the residents' rights under sections 407.3000 to
407.3006.
3. The department shall establish an AI task force
comprised of members from the general assembly, industry,
academia, and consumer advocacy groups to:
(1) Monitor compliance with sections 407.3000 to
407.3006;
(2) Recommend updates to comply with emerging AI
technologies; and
(3) Submit an annual report to the general assembly on
the impact of provisions of sections 407.3000 to 407.3006.
407.3006. Nothing in sections 407.3000 to 407.3006
shall preempt any city, town, county, or any other political
subdivision from enacting stricter or more stringent
ordinances, laws, or rules provided they do not conflict
with provisions of sections 407.3000 to 407.3006.
Section B. If any provision of section A of this act
or the application thereof to anyone or to any circumstance
is held invalid, the remainder of those sections and the
application of such provisions to others or other
circumstances shall not be affected thereby.
✓